Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2334YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 240 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 479B.13A Insurance requirements 1 for permittee. 2 1. In addition to the requirements of section 479B.13, 3 before a permit is granted under this chapter, the applicant 4 shall provide to the commission evidence of an appropriate 5 surety or insurance policy to ensure the payment of all damages 6 resulting from the construction and operation of the hazardous 7 liquid pipeline. The surety or insurance policy must be 8 sufficient to indemnify fully all of the following: 9 a. Any loss arising from or related to any negligent or 10 intentional discharge of content from the pipeline. 11 b. Any injury, including diminution of value of real 12 property, to affected properties due to the construction of the 13 pipeline or the accidental or intentional discharge of content. 14 c. The inability for a person to obtain insurance, or the 15 increased costs for a person to obtain or renew insurance, due 16 to the presence or construction of the pipeline. 17 2. If any person is unable to obtain insurance, or 18 experiences increased costs to obtain or renew insurance, as 19 a result of the presence or construction of the pipeline, the 20 pipeline owner shall either purchase insurance on behalf of 21 the person or reimburse the person for the personâs increased 22 premium costs. 23